Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 37 Sexual Assault

11-37-1.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases, when used in this chapter, have the following meanings:

“Accused” means a person accused of a sexual assault.

“Force or coercion” means when the accused does any of the following:

Uses or threatens to use a weapon, or any article used or fashioned in a manner to lead the victim to reasonably believe it to be a weapon.

Overcomes the victim through the application of physical force or physical violence.

Coerces the victim to submit by threatening to use force or violence on the victim and the victim reasonably believes that the accused has the present ability to execute these threats.

Coerces the victim to submit by threatening to at some time in the future murder, inflict serious bodily injury upon or kidnap the victim or any other person and the victim reasonably believes that the accused has the ability to execute this threat.

“Intimate parts” means the genital or anal areas, groin, inner thigh, or buttock of any person or the breast of a female.

“Mentally disabled” means a person who has a mental impairment which renders that person incapable of appraising the nature of the act.

“Mentally incapacitated” means a person who is rendered temporarily incapable of appraising or controlling his or her conduct due to the influence of a narcotic, anesthetic, or other substance administered to that person without his or her consent, or who is mentally unable to communicate unwillingness to engage in the act.

“Physically helpless” means a person who is unconscious, asleep, or for any other reason is physically unable to communicate unwillingness to an act.

“Sexual contact” means the intentional touching of the victim’s or accused’s intimate parts, clothed or unclothed, if that intentional touching can be reasonably construed as intended by the accused to be for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification, or assault.

“Sexual penetration” means sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, and anal intercourse, or any other intrusion, however slight, by any part of a person’s body or by any object into the genital or anal openings of another person’s body, or the victim’s own body upon the accused’s instruction, but emission of semen is not required.

“Spouse” means a person married to the accused at the time of the alleged sexual assault, except that such persons shall not be considered the spouse if the couple are living apart and a decision for divorce has been granted, whether or not a final decree has been entered.

“Victim” means the person alleging to have been subjected to sexual assault.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 13; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 13.

11-37-2.
First degree sexual assault.

A person is guilty of first degree sexual assault if he or she engages in sexual penetration with another person, and if any of the following circumstances exist:

The accused knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapacitated, mentally disabled, or physically helpless.

The accused uses force or coercion.

The accused, through concealment or by the element of surprise, is able to overcome the victim.

The accused engages in the medical treatment or examination of the victim for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification, or stimulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 75, § 1, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 76, § 1, effective June 23, 2021.

11-37-2.1.
Repealed.

11-37-3.
Penalty for first degree sexual assault.

Every person who shall commit sexual assault in the first degree shall be imprisoned for a period not less than ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for life.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-3.1.
Duty to report sexual assault.

Any person, other than the victim, who knows or has reason to know that a first degree sexual assault or attempted first degree sexual assault is taking place in his or her presence shall immediately notify the state police or the police department of the city or town in which the assault or attempted assault is taking place of the crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 268, § 1.

11-37-3.2.
Necessity of complaint from victim.

No person shall be charged under §

11-37-3.1

unless and until the police department investigating the incident obtains from the victim a signed complaint against the person alleging a violation of §

11-37-3.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 268, § 1.

11-37-3.3.
Failure to report — Penalty.

Any person who knowingly fails to report a sexual assault or attempted sexual assault as required under §

11-37-3.1

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 268, § 1.

11-37-3.4.
Immunity from liability.

Any person participating in good faith in making a report pursuant to §

11-37-3.1

shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 268, § 1.

11-37-3.5.
Duty to report sexual misconduct conviction.

If a public school teacher or employee is convicted of a new violation of this chapter, the chief of police of the arresting department shall notify the appropriate school district, superintendent of schools, the department of public safety, and the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 484, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 178, § 1.

11-37-4.
Second degree sexual assault.

A person is guilty of a second-degree sexual assault if he or she engages in sexual contact with another person and if any of the following circumstances exist:

The accused knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapacitated, mentally disabled, or physically helpless.

The accused uses force, element of surprise, or coercion.

The accused engages in the medical treatment or examination of the victim for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification, or stimulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 164, § 1.

11-37-5.
Penalty for second degree sexual assault.

Every person who shall commit sexual assault in the second degree shall be imprisoned for not less than three (3) years and not more than fifteen (15) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-6.
Third degree sexual assault.

Definitions. For purposes of this chapter, “position of authority” means and includes, but is not limited to, any person who is acting in the place of a parent and charged with any of a parent’s rights, duties, or responsibilities to a person under the age of eighteen (18) years, or a person who is charged with any duty or responsibility for the health, welfare, or supervision of a person under the age of eighteen (18) years, either independently or through another, no matter how brief, at the time of the act.

A person is guilty of third-degree sexual assault if:

He or she is over the age of eighteen (18) years and engaged in sexual penetration with another person over the age of fourteen (14) years and under the age of consent, sixteen (16) years of age; or

He or she is over the age of eighteen (18) years and engaged in sexual penetration or sexual contact with another person over the age of fourteen (14) years and under the age of eighteen (18) years, under circumstances whereby:

The accused has supervisory or disciplinary power over the victim by virtue of the accused’s legal, professional, or occupational status; or

The accused is otherwise acting in a position of authority with respect to the victim.

It shall not be a violation of subsection (b)(2) of this section if the parties are:

Engaging in sexual penetration or contact consensually;

Between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty (20) years; and

No more than thirty (30) months apart in age.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 153, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 154, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

11-37-7.
Penalty for third degree sexual assault.

Every person who shall commit sexual assault in the third degree shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-8.
Penalty for assault with intent to commit first degree sexual assault.

Every person who shall commit assault with intent to commit first degree sexual assault shall be imprisoned for not less than three (3) years or more than twenty (20) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-8.1.
First degree child molestation sexual assault.

A person is guilty of first degree child molestation sexual assault if he or she engages in sexual penetration with a person fourteen (14) years of age or under.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 219, § 1.

11-37-8.2.
Penalty for first degree child molestation sexual assault.

Every person who shall commit first degree child molestation sexual assault shall be imprisoned for a period of not less than twenty-five (25) years and may be imprisoned for life.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 3.

11-37-8.2.1.
Penalty for first degree child molestation sexual assault — Jessica Lunsford Child Predator Act of 2006.

Title and Legislative Intent. The title of this section shall be “The Jessica Lunsford Child Predator Act of 2006.” In enacting this section the general assembly intends that in order to ensure the safety of victims the most dangerous child predators be electronically monitored via an active global positioning system in order to ensure that their whereabouts can be easily ascertained by law enforcement and other responsible authorities at all times while providing treatment to offenders.

Every person who shall violate the provisions of subdivisions

11-37-8.2.1(b)(1)

—

11-37-8.2.1(b)(2)

listed herein shall be electronically monitored via an active global positioning system for life and, as a condition of parole and probation, and for the duration of any period of his or her probation following his or her parole shall attend a sex offender treatment program to address his or her criminally offensive behavior, as determined by the department of probation and parole. The persons subject to this condition of parole shall include:

Persons who commit first degree child molestation sexual assault on or after January 1, 2007 and the victim of the sexual assault is twelve (12) years of age or younger; or

Persons who shall violate the conditions of §

11-37-8.1

on or after January 1, 2007 and be determined a high-risk of re-offense (level 3) offender under the conditions of §

11-37.1-12

, and the person is deemed a child predator as defined in subsection

11-37-8.2.1(g)

or have committed the offense in conjunction with circumstances involving kidnapping, torture or aggravated battery, and provided further that the victim to the offense is fourteen (14) years of age or younger.

Any person who violates the terms of the global position monitoring conditions shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any costs associated with the requirements of this section shall be borne by the offender and the court is hereby authorized and empowered to utilize all resources available to collect the funds for these costs unless the court finds that the defendant is indigent. In such cases costs shall be waived in order to promote this section’s legislative intent.

Harboring.

Any person who has reason to know that a person convicted of first degree child molestation as defined by §

11-37-8.1

or

11-37-8.2.1

is not complying or has not complied with the requirements of this section where applicable and who with the intent to assist the child molester in eluding a law enforcement agency that is seeking to find the child molester to question the child molester about or to arrest the child molester for his or her non-compliance with the requirements of this section and who:

knowingly withholds information from or willfully fails to notify the law enforcement agency about the child molester’s non-compliance with the requirements of this section; or

harbors or attempts to harbor or assists another person in harboring or attempting to harbor the child molester; or

knowingly conceals or attempts to conceal or assists another person in concealing or attempting to conceal the child molester; or

provides information to the law enforcement agency regarding the child molester that the person knows to be false information commits a felony and shall be subject to imprisonment for a period of five (5) years. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as limiting the discretion of the judges to impose additional sanctions authorized in sentencing.

Any person who permits a child predator as defined by this section to reside with them knowing that the child predator has failed to comply with the requirements of subsection

11-37-8.2.1(b)

commits a felony punishable by up to five (5) years imprisonment and/or a five thousand dollar ($5,000) fine.

Any person who intentionally tampers with damages or destroys any electronic monitoring equipment required by this section pursuant to a court order or parole board order unless such person is the owner of the equipment or an agent of the owner performing ordinary maintenance and repairs commits a felony and shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five (5) years.

The department of corrections, prior to the release from incarceration of any child predator, shall ensure that the child predator’s fingerprints are taken and forwarded to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI) division within the department of attorney general within forty-eight (48) hours after release from incarceration. The fingerprint card shall be clearly marked “Child Predator Registration Card.”

For the purposes of this section “child predator” shall be defined as any person convicted of any violation of §

11-37-8.1

, and who on a prior occasion has been convicted of a violation of §

11-37-8.1

or §

11-37-8.3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 1.

11-37-8.3.
Second degree child molestation sexual assault.

A person is guilty of a second degree child molestation sexual assault if he or she engages in sexual contact with another person fourteen (14) years of age or under.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 219, § 1.

11-37-8.4.
Penalty for second degree child molestation sexual assault.

Every person who shall commit second degree child molestation sexual assault shall be imprisoned for not less than six (6) years nor more than thirty (30) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 2.

11-37-8.5.
Identification of victims of child molestation sexual assault.

All court records which concern the identity of a victim of child molestation sexual assault shall be confidential and shall not be made public.

Every agency of state or local government shall protect the confidentiality of documents containing the identity of victims of child molestation sexual assault.

A defendant charged with child molestation sexual assault may make application to the trial court for an order of disclosure of identifying information concerning the child victim in order to prepare his or her defense. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the disclosure of the victim’s identity to the defendant at the time of his or her arraignment, provided, that the defendant shall make no disclosure of the victim’s identity other than to his or her attorney and others directly involved in the preparation of his or her defense. Any disclosure by a defendant other than permitted in this section shall constitute contempt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 380, § 2.

11-37-8.6.
Special assessment — Payment for treatment or counseling.

In addition to all other statutory costs and assessments, every person, adjudged guilty of the provisions of §

11-37-8.1

or

11-37-8.3

, whether by trial, plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere, shall pay a special assessment of one hundred dollars ($100). In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person convicted under §§

11-37-8.1

—

11-37-8.3

may be required, as part of the sentence imposed by the court, to pay the cost of any necessary medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment of the child resulting from the act or acts for which the defendant is convicted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 137, § 1.

11-37-8.7.
Parole of violators.

In the case of any person convicted and imprisoned for an offense under §§

11-37-8.1

—

11-37-8.3

, it shall be required that:

The department of attorney general or local prosecutor be informed by the parole board ninety (90) days prior to a parole hearing of the date of hearing, and the attorney general or local prosecutor provide the parole board with a complete statement of circumstances surrounding a conviction within forty-five (45) days prior to the scheduled parole hearing date.

The parole board shall notify the victim and his or her family of a scheduled parole hearing at least forty-five (45) days prior to the date of hearing, and the victim and/or family shall be permitted an opportunity to provide a statement for review by the parole board.

The convicted person shall be examined prior to parole by one independent psychiatrist to determine whether the person is a continued danger to children.

The convicted person shall receive outpatient treatment at his or her own expense after parole or release from hospitalization for a period of time to be set by the parole board, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall oversee and provide these services. Any person willfully violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall serve not more than one year imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 528, § 1.

11-37-8.8.
Indecent solicitation of a child.

A person is guilty of indecent solicitation of a child if he or she knowingly solicits another person under eighteen (18) years of age or one whom he or she believes is a person under eighteen (18) years of age for the purpose of engaging in an act of prostitution or in any act in violation of chapter 9, 34, or 37 of this title.

As used in this section, the word “solicit” or “solicitation” means to command, authorize, urge, incite, request, or advise another to perform an act by any means including, but not limited to, in person, over the phone, in writing, by computer, through the Internet, or by advertisement of any kind.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 586, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 612, § 1.

11-37-8.9.
Penalty for indecent solicitation of a child.

Every person who shall commit indecent solicitation of a child shall be imprisoned for not less than five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 586, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 612, § 1.

11-37-9.
Joinder of offenses.

Any person who shall be indicted for first, second, or third degree sexual assault and/or first or second degree child molestation sexual assault and/or §

11-37-8

may also be charged in the same indictment with either or all of the offenses described in §§

11-37-2

,

11-37-4

,

11-37-6

,

11-37-8

,

11-37-8.1

, and

11-37-8.3

. If upon trial the jury shall acquit the person of any of the charges of sexual assault and shall find him or her guilty of any of the other offenses, judgment and sentence may be entered against him or her accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 1.

11-37-10.
Subsequent offenses.

If a person is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under the provisions of §§

11-37-2

,

11-37-4

,

11-37-8

,

11-37-8

.1, and

11-37-8.3

, the sentence imposed under these sections for the second or subsequent offenses shall not be less than twice the minimum number of years of sentence for the most recent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 59, § 1.

11-37-11.
Corroboration of victim’s testimony unnecessary.

The testimony of the victim need not be corroborated in prosecutions under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-11.1.
[Reserved.]

11-37-11.2.
Speedy trial.

In any action under this chapter involving a child victim age fourteen (14) years or under or a victim sixty-five (65) years or older, the court and the attorney general’s office shall take appropriate action to ensure a speedy trial to minimize the length of time the victim must endure the stress of involvement in the proceeding. In ruling on any motion or request for a delay or continuance of proceedings, the court shall consider any adverse impact the delay or continuance may have on the well-being of the victim or witness. This provision establishes a right to a speedy trial to the victim and shall not be construed as creating any additional rights to the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 219, § 1.

11-37-12.
Proof of resistance unnecessary.

In any prosecution brought under this chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove that the victim physically resisted the accused if the victim reasonably believed that resistance would be useless and might result in his or her serious bodily injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 273, § 1.

11-37-13.
Prior sexual conduct of complainant — Admissibility of evidence.

If a defendant who is charged with the crime of sexual assault intends to introduce proof that the complaining witness has engaged in sexual activities with other persons, he or she shall give notice of that intention to the court and the attorney for the state. The notice shall be given prior to the introduction of any evidence of that fact; it shall be given orally out of the hearing of spectators and, if the action is being tried by a jury, out of the hearing of the jurors. Upon receiving the notice, the court shall order the defendant to make a specific offer of the proof that he or she intends to introduce in support of this issue. The offer of proof, and all arguments relating to it, shall take place outside the hearing of spectators and jurors. The court shall then rule upon the admissibility of the evidence offered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-13.1.
Recording — Grand jury testimony — Child assault.

In any grand jury proceeding investigating a sexual assault alleged to have been committed against a child, a recording of a statement from the alleged victim who is sixteen (16) years of age or younger at the time of the proceeding shall be admissible into evidence at the proceeding if:

The statement is sworn to under oath by the child, and the significance of the oath is explained to the child;

The recording is both visual and aural and is recorded on film or videotape or by other electronic means;

The recording equipment was capable of making an accurate recording, the operator of the equipment was competent, and the recording is accurate and has not been altered;

Every voice on the recording is identified;

The statement was not made in response to questioning calculated to lead the child to make a particular statement;

The person conducting the interview is an attorney in the department of the attorney general or another person chosen by the attorney general to make the proceeding less intimidating to the child, and the interviewer is available to testify at the proceeding;

The child is available to testify if requested by the grand jurors; and

The recording is made a part of the record of the grand jury.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 214, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 215, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 473, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 214, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 215, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

11-37-13.2.
Alternative methods of victim testimony — Child victim.

In any judicial proceeding in which a person has been charged with sexual assault of a child who at the time of trial is seventeen (17) years of age or less, the court may order, upon a showing that the child is unable to testify before the court without suffering unreasonable and unnecessary mental or emotional harm, that the testimony of the child be taken in a room other than the courtroom and either be recorded for later showing before the court and/or the finder of fact in the proceeding or be broadcast simultaneously by closed circuit television to the court and/or finder of fact in the proceeding. When the child is fourteen (14) years of age or younger at the time of trial, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the child is unable to testify before the court without suffering unreasonable and unnecessary mental or emotional harm. Only the judge, attorneys for the parties, persons necessary to operate the recording or broadcasting equipment, and any person whose presence would contribute to the welfare and well-being of the child may be present in the room with the child during his or her testimony. Examination and cross-examination shall proceed in the same manner as permitted at the trial or hearing.

The persons operating the equipment shall be confined to an adjacent room or behind a screen or mirror which permits them to see and hear the child during his or her testimony, but does not permit the child to see or hear them. The court shall permit the defendant to observe and hear the testimony of the child in person, but ensure that the child cannot hear or see the person alleged to have committed the assault. The defendant shall be afforded a means of communicating with his or her attorney throughout the proceedings, and, upon request of the defendant or his or her attorney, recesses shall be permitted to allow them to confer. The court shall ensure that:

The recording or broadcast is both visual and aural and is recorded on film or videotape or by other electronic means;

The recording equipment was capable of making an accurate recording, the operator of the equipment was competent, and the recording is accurate and has not been altered;

Each voice on the recording is identified;

Each party is afforded an opportunity to view any recording made prior to trial before it is shown in the courtroom; and

The statement is sworn to under oath by the child.

If the court orders the testimony of a child to be so recorded or broadcast, the child shall not be required to testify at the proceeding for which the testimony was taken, and the testimony shall be used in lieu of the live testimony of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 473, § 1.

11-37-13.3.
Sexual assault reports.

A law enforcement officer who responds to or investigates a sexual assault or child molestation sexual assault incident, shall, upon determination of probable cause for arrest or referral to the attorney general’s office, complete a sexual assault report (DV/SA-1).

For the purpose of establishing data on the extent and severity of arrests for sexual assault and child molestation sexual assault in the state and on the degree of compliance with the requirements of this section the domestic violence training and monitoring unit of the court system shall prescribe a form for making sexual assault reports. The form shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

Name of the parties;

Relationship of the parties;

Sex of the parties;

Date of birth of the parties;

Time and date of the alleged incident;

Whether children were allegedly involved or whether the alleged act of sexual assault or child molestation sexual assault was committed in the presence of children;

Type and extent of the alleged abuse;

Number and types of alleged weapons involved;

Existence of any prior court order; and

Any other data that may be necessary for a complete analysis of all circumstances leading to the arrest.

Each police department shall forward copies of the reports to the unit at the end of each month.

Upon adjudication of acquittal, dismissal or other exoneration the sexual assault report form will be expunged by the domestic violence training and monitoring unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 411, § 1.

11-37-14.
Severability.

If the provisions of this chapter or their application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, their invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 302, § 2.

11-37-15, 11-37-16.
Repealed.

11-37-17.
Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) — Mandatory testing.

Any person who has admitted to or been convicted of or adjudicated wayward or delinquent by reason of having committed any sexual offense involving sexual penetration, as defined in §

11-37-1

, whether or not sentence or fine is imposed or probation granted, shall be ordered by the court upon the petition of the victim, immediate family members of the victim or legal guardian of the victim, to submit to a blood test for the presence of a sexually transmitted disease including, but not limited to, the Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) which causes Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) as provided for in chapter 23-6.3.

Notwithstanding the limitations imposed by §§

23-6.3-7

and

5-37.3-4

, the results of the HIV test shall be reported to the court, which shall then disclose the results to any victim of the sexual offense who requests disclosure. Review and disclosure of blood test results by the courts shall be closed and confidential, and any transaction records relating to them shall also be closed and confidential.

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 3, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 3].

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 3, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 3].

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 3, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 3].

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 17.